Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2204
Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission; established; State Capitol Administrator; appointment.

The Nebraska Capitol Commission shall be the custodian of the State Capitol and capitol grounds. To aid in these duties, the Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission is established under the Nebraska Capitol Commission. The State Capitol Administrator shall be the head of the office and shall be recommended by the commission and appointed by the Governor. The compensation of the administrator shall be established by the Governor, subject to availability of appropriations. For administrative and budgetary purposes, the office shall be housed within the Department of Administrative Services, which department shall provide all of the accounting, personnel, information management, and communication support services for the office. The office and all staff shall be physically located in the State Capitol. All administration and budgetary decisions for the office shall be made by the administrator.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 4.